North Carolina statutes. Chapter 110. Child Welfare.
Article 7. Child Care Facilities.

§ 110-85.
Legislative intent and purpose.

Recognizing the importance of the early years of life to a child’s development, the General Assembly hereby declares its intent with respect to the early care and education of children:

The State should protect children in child care facilities by ensuring that these facilities provide a physically safe and healthy environment where the developmental needs of these children are met and where these children are cared for by qualified persons of good moral character.

Repealed by Session Laws 1997-506, s. 2, effective September 16, 1997.

Achieving this level of protection and early education requires the following elements: mandatory licensing of child care facilities; promotion of higher quality child care through the development of enhanced standards which operators may comply with on a voluntary basis; and a program of education to help operators improve their programs and to deepen public understanding of child care needs and issues.

History.

1971, c. 803, s. 1; 1987, c. 788, s. 1; 1997-506, ss. 1, 2.

Task Force on the Consolidation of Early Childhood Education and Care.

For provisions regarding the Task Force on the Consolidation of Early Childhood Education and Care under Session Laws
2009-451, s. 10.7A, see the notes at
G.S. 143B-138.1 and
G.S. 143B-168.10.

Session Laws
2017-57, s. 11B.1(a)-(f), provides: “(a) Eligibility. — The Department of Health and Human Services, Division of Child Development and Early Education, shall continue implementing the prekindergarten program (NC Pre-K). The NC Pre-K program shall serve children who are four years of age on or before August 31 of the program year. In determining eligibility, the Division shall establish income eligibility requirements for the program not to exceed seventy-five percent (75%) of the State median income. Up to twenty percent (20%) of children enrolled may have family incomes in excess of seventy-five percent (75%) of median income if those children have other designated risk factors. Furthermore, any age-eligible child who is a child of either of the following shall be eligible for the program: (i) an active duty member of the Armed Forces of the United States, including the North Carolina National Guard, State military forces, or a reserve component of the Armed Forces who was ordered to active duty by the proper authority within the last 18 months or is expected to be ordered within the next 18 months, or (ii) a member of the Armed Forces of the United States, including the North Carolina National Guard, State military forces, or a reserve component of the Armed Forces who was injured or killed while serving on active duty. Eligibility determinations for NC Pre-K participants may continue through local education agencies and local North Carolina Partnership for Children, Inc., partnerships.

“Other than developmental disabilities or other chronic health issues, the Division shall not consider the health of a child as a factor in determining eligibility for participation in the NC Pre-K program.

“(b) Multiyear Contracts. — The Division of Child Development and Early Education shall require the NC Pre-K contractor to issue multiyear contracts for licensed private child care centers providing NC Pre-K classrooms.

“(b1) Building Standards. — Notwithstanding
G.S. 110-91(4), private child care facilities and public schools operating NC Pre-K classrooms shall meet the building standards for preschool students as provided in

G.S. 115C-521.1

.

“(c) Programmatic Standards. — Except as provided in subsection (b1) of this section, entities operating NC Pre-K classrooms shall adhere to all of the policies prescribed by the Division of Child Development and Early Education regarding programmatic standards and classroom requirements.

“(d) NC Pre-K Committees. — Local NC Pre-K committees shall use the standard decision-making process developed by the Division of Child Development and Early Education in awarding NC Pre-K classroom slots and student selection.

“(e) Reporting. — The Division of Child Development and Early Education shall submit an annual report no later than March 15 of each year to the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Health and Human Services, the Office of State Budget and Management, and the Fiscal Research Division. The report shall include the following:

“(1) The number of children participating in the NC Pre-K program by county.

“(2) The number of children participating in the NC Pre-K program who have never been served in other early education programs such as child care, public or private preschool, Head Start, Early Head Start, or early intervention programs.

“(3) The expected NC Pre-K expenditures for the programs and the source of the local contributions.

“(4) The results of an annual evaluation of the NC Pre-K program.

“(f) Audits. — The administration of the NC Pre-K program by local partnerships shall be subject to the financial and compliance audits authorized under
G.S. 143B-168.14(b).”

For prior similar provisions, see Session Laws
2012-142, s. 10.1,
2013-360, s. 12B.1(a)-(g), as amended by Session Laws
2016-94, s. 12B.1(a), (b), Session Laws
2013-360, s. 12B.1(j), as added by Session Laws
2013-363, s. 4.3, and Session Laws
2015-241, s. 12B.1.

NC Pre-K Programs/Standards for Four-and-Five-Star-Rated Facilities.

Session Laws 2021-180, s. 9C.1, (a)-(g), provides: “(a) Eligibility. – The Department of Health and Human Services, Division of Child Development and Early Education, shall continue implementing the prekindergarten program (NC Pre-K). The NC Pre-K program shall serve children who are 4 years of age on or before August 31 of the program year. In determining eligibility, the Division shall establish income eligibility requirements for the program not to exceed seventy-five percent (75%) of the State median income. Up to twenty percent (20%) of children enrolled may have family incomes in excess of seventy-five percent (75%) of median income if those children have other designated risk factors. Furthermore, any age-eligible child who is a child of either of the following shall be eligible for the program: (i) an active duty member of the Armed Forces of the United States, including the North Carolina National Guard, State military forces, or a reserve component of the Armed Forces who was ordered to active duty by the proper authority within the last 18 months or is expected to be ordered within the next 18 months, or (ii) a member of the Armed Forces of the United States, including the North Carolina National Guard, State military forces, or a reserve component of the Armed Forces who was injured or killed while serving on active duty. Eligibility determinations for NC Pre-K participants may continue through local education agencies and local North Carolina Partnership for Children, Inc., partnerships.

“Other than developmental disabilities or other chronic health issues, the Division shall not consider the health of a child as a factor in determining eligibility for participation in the NC Pre-K program.

“(b) Multiyear Contracts. – The Division of Child Development and Early Education shall require the NC Pre-K contractor to issue multiyear contracts for licensed private child care centers providing NC Pre-K classrooms.

“(c) Building Standards. – Notwithstanding G.S. 110-91(4), private child care facilities and public schools operating NC Pre-K classrooms shall meet the building standards for preschool students as provided in

G.S. 115C-521.1

.

“(d) Programmatic Standards. – Except as provided in subsection (c) of this section, entities operating NC Pre-K classrooms shall adhere to all of the policies prescribed by the Division of Child Development and Early Education regarding programmatic standards and classroom requirements.

“(e) NC Pre-K Committees. – Local NC Pre-K committees shall use the standard decision-making process developed by the Division of Child Development and Early Education in awarding NC Pre-K classroom slots and student selection.

“(f) Reporting. – The Division of Child Development and Early Education shall submit an annual report no later than March 15 of each year to the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Health and Human Services, the Office of State Budget and Management, and the Fiscal Research Division. The report shall include the following:

“(1) The number of children participating in the NC Pre-K program by county.

“(2) The number of children participating in the NC Pre-K program who have never been served in other early education programs such as child care, public or private preschool, Head Start, Early Head Start, or early intervention programs.

“(3) The expected NC Pre-K expenditures for the programs and the source of the local contributions.

“(4) The results of an annual evaluation of the NC Pre-K program.

“(g) Audits. – The administration of the NC Pre-K program by local partnerships shall be subject to the financial and compliance audits authorized under G.S. 143B-168.14(b).”

§ 110-86.
Definitions.

Unless the context or subject matter otherwise requires, the terms or phrases used in this Article shall be defined as follows:

Commission. — The Child Care Commission created under this Article.

Child care. — A program or arrangement where three or more children less than 13 years old, who do not reside where the care is provided, receive care on a regular basis of at least once per week for more than four hours but less than 24 hours per day from persons other than their guardians or full-time custodians, or from persons not related to them by birth, marriage, or adoption. Child care does not include the following:

Arrangements operated in the home of any child receiving care if all of the children in care are related to each other and no more than two additional children are in care;

Recreational programs operated for less than four consecutive months in a year;

Specialized activities or instruction such as athletics, dance, art, music lessons, horseback riding, gymnastics, or organized clubs for children, such as Boy Scouts, Girl Scouts, 4-H groups, or boys and girls clubs;

Drop-in or short-term care provided while parents participate in activities that are not employment related and where the parents are on the premises or otherwise easily accessible, such as drop-in or short-term care provided in health spas, bowling alleys, shopping malls, resort hotels, or churches;

d1.

Drop-in or short-term care provided by an employer for its part-time employees where (i) the child is provided care not to exceed two and one-half hours during that day, (ii) the parents are on the premises, and (iii) there are no more than 25 children in any one group in any one room;

Public schools;

Nonpublic schools described in Part 2 of Article 39 of Chapter 115C of the General Statutes that are accredited by national or regional accrediting agencies with early childhood standards and that operate (i) a child care facility as defined in subdivision (3) of this section for less than six and one-half hours per day either on or off the school site or (ii) a child care facility for more than six and one-half hours per day, but do not receive NC Pre-K or child care subsidy funding;

Bible schools conducted during vacation periods;

Care provided by facilities licensed under Article 2 of Chapter 122C of the General Statutes;

Cooperative arrangements among parents to provide care for their own children as a convenience rather than for employment. This exemption shall include arrangements between a group of parents, regardless of whether the parents are working, to provide for the instructional needs of their children, provided the arrangement occurs in the home of one of the cooperative participants;

Any child care program or arrangement consisting of two or more separate components, each of which operates for four hours or less per day with different children attending each component; and

Track-out programs provided to school-age children when they are out of school on a year-round school calendar.

(2a)

Child care administrator. — A person who is responsible for the operation of a child care facility and is on-site on a regular basis.

Child care facility. — Includes child care centers, family child care homes, and any other child care arrangement not excluded by

G.S. 110-86(2)

, that provides child care, regardless of the time of day, wherever operated, and whether or not operated for profit.

A child care center is an arrangement where, at any one time, there are three or more preschool-age children or nine or more school-age children receiving child care.

A family child care home is a child care arrangement located in a residence where, at any one time, more than two children, but less than nine children, receive child care.

Repealed by Session Laws 1997-506, s. 3.

(4a)

Department. — Department of Health and Human Services.

Repealed by Session Laws 1975, c. 879, s. 15.

(5a)

Lead teacher. — An individual who is responsible for planning and implementing the daily program of activities for a group of children in a child care facility.

License. — A permit issued by the Secretary to any child care facility which meets the statutory standards established under this Article.

Operator. — Includes the owner, director or other person having primary responsibility for operation of a child care facility subject to licensing.

Secretary. — The Secretary of the Department of Health and Human Services.

History.

1971, c. 803, s. 1; 1975, c. 879, s. 15; 1977, c. 4, ss. 1-3; 1983, c. 46, s. 1; c. 297, ss. 1, 2; 1983 (Reg. Sess., 1984), c. 1034, s. 78; 1985, c. 589, s. 36; c. 757, s. 155(c); 1987, c. 788, s. 2; 1989, c. 234; 1991, c. 273, s. 1; 1991 (Reg. Sess., 1992), c. 904, ss. 1, 2; c. 1024, s. 1; c. 1030, s. 51.12; 1997-443, ss. 11A.118(a), 11A.122; 1997-506, s. 3; 2005-416, s. 1; 2013-360, s. 8.29(b); 2014-49, s. 8; 2016-7, s. 1; 2020-97, s. 3.7A(b).

Cross References.

As to the Child Care Commission, see G.S. 143B-168.3 et seq.

§ 110-87.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1975, c. 879, s. 15.

§ 110-88.
Powers and duties of the Commission.

The Commission shall have the following powers and duties:

To develop policies and procedures for the issuance of a license to any child care facility that meets all applicable standards established under this Article.

(1a)

To adopt applicable rules and standards based upon the capacity of a child care facility.

To require inspections by and satisfactory written reports from representatives of local or State health agencies, fire and building inspection agencies, and from representatives of the Department prior to the issuance of an initial license to any child care center.

(2a)

To require annually, inspections by and satisfactory written reports from representatives of local or State health agencies and fire inspection agencies after a license is issued.

Repealed by Session Laws 1997-506, s. 4.

Repealed by Session Laws 1975, c. 879, s. 15.

To adopt rules and develop policies for implementation of this Article, including procedures for application, approval, annual compliance visits for centers, and revocation of licenses.

To adopt rules for the issuance of a provisional license that shall be in effect for no more than 12 consecutive months to a child care facility that does not conform in every respect with the standards established in this Article and rules adopted by the Commission pursuant to this Article but that is making a reasonable effort to conform to the standards.

(6a)

To adopt rules for administrative action against a child care facility when the Secretary’s investigations pursuant to G.S. 110-105(a)(3) substantiate that child abuse or neglect did occur in the facility. The rules shall provide for types of sanctions which shall depend upon the severity of the incident and the probability of reoccurrence. The rules shall also provide for written warnings and special provisional licenses.

To develop and adopt voluntary enhanced program standards which reflect higher quality child care than the mandatory standards established by this Article. These enhanced program standards must address, at a minimum, staff/child ratios, staff qualifications, parent involvement, operational and personnel policies, developmentally appropriate curricula, and facility square footage.

To develop a procedure by which the Department shall furnish those forms as may be required for implementation of this Article.

Repealed by Session Laws 1985, c. 757, s. 156(66).

To adopt rules for the issuance of a temporary license which shall expire in six months and which may be issued to the operator of a new center or to the operator of a previously licensed center when a change in ownership or location occurs.

To adopt rules for child care facilities which provide care for children who are mildly sick.

To adopt rules regulating the amount of time a child care administrator shall be on-site at a child care center.

To adopt rules for child care facilities that provide care for medically fragile children.

To adopt rules establishing standards for certification of child care centers providing Developmental Day programs.

The Division and the Commission shall permit individual facilities to make curriculum decisions and may not require the standards, policies, or curriculum of any single accrediting child care organization. If Division inquiries to providers include database fields or questions regarding accreditation, the inquiry shall permit daycare providers to fill in any accrediting organization from which they have received accreditation.

History.

1971, c. 803, s. 1; 1975, c. 879, s. 15; 1985, c. 757, s. 155(d), (e), 156(a), (z), (aa), (bb); 1987, c. 543, s. 2; c. 788, s. 3; c. 827, s. 232; 1991, c. 273, s. 2; 1993, c. 185, s. 1; 1997-506, ss. 4(a), 28.3; 1999-130, ss. 1, 5; 2004-124, s. 10.35; 2009-187, s. 2.

§ 110-88.1.
Commission may not interfere with religious training offered in religious-sponsored child care facilities.

Nothing in this Article shall be interpreted to allow the State to determine the training or curriculum offered in any religious-sponsored child care facility as defined in G.S. 110-106(a).

History.

1999-130, s. 6.

§ 110-89.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1975, c. 879, s. 15.

§ 110-90.
Powers and duties of Secretary of Health and Human Services.

The Secretary shall have the following powers and duties under the policies and rules of the Commission:

To administer the licensing program for child care facilities.

(1a)

To establish a fee for the licensing of child care facilities. The fee does not apply to a religious-sponsored child care facility operated pursuant to a letter of compliance. The amount of the fee may not exceed the amount listed in this subdivision.

Click to view

To obtain and coordinate the necessary services from other State departments and units of local government which are necessary to implement the provisions of this Article.

To employ the administrative personnel and staff as may be necessary to implement this Article where required services, inspections or reports are not available from existing State agencies and units of local government.

To issue a rated license to any child care facility which meets the standards established by this Article. The rating shall be based on the following:

Before January 1, 2008, for any child care facility currently holding a license of two to five stars, the rating shall be based on program standards, education levels of staff, and compliance history of the child care facility. By January 1, 2008, the rating shall be based on program standards and education levels of staff.

Effective January 1, 2006, for any new license issued to a child care facility with a rating of two to five stars, the rating shall be based on program standards and education levels of staff.

By January 1, 2008, for any child care facility to maintain a license or Notice of Compliance, the child care facility shall have a compliance history of at least seventy-five percent (75%), as assessed by the Department. When a child care facility fails to maintain a compliance history of at least seventy-five percent (75%) for the past 18 months or during the length of time the facility has operated, whichever is less, as assessed by the Department, the Department may issue a provisional license or Notice of Compliance.

Effective January 1, 2006, for any new license or Notice of Compliance issued to a child care facility, the facility shall maintain a compliance history of at least seventy-five percent (75%), as assessed by the Department. When a child care facility fails to maintain a compliance history of at least seventy-five percent (75%) for the past 18 months or during the length of time the facility has operated, whichever is less, as assessed by the Department, the Department may issue a provisional license or Notice of Compliance.

The Department shall provide additional opportunities for child care providers to earn points for program standards and education levels of staff.

To revoke the license of any child care facility that ceases to meet the standards established by this Article and rules on these standards adopted by the Commission, or that demonstrates a pattern of noncompliance with this Article or the rules, or to deny a license to any applicant that fails to meet the standards or the rules. These revocations and denials shall be done in accordance with the procedures set out in G.S. 150B and this Article and rules adopted by the Commission.

To prosecute or defend on behalf of the State, through the office of the Attorney General, any legal actions arising out of the administration or enforcement of this Article.

To promote and coordinate educational programs and materials for operators of child care facilities which are designed to improve the quality of child care available in the State, using the resources of other State and local agencies and educational institutions where appropriate.

Repealed by Session Laws 1997-506, s. 5.

To levy a civil penalty pursuant to

G.S. 110-103.1

, or an administrative penalty pursuant to

G.S. 110-102.2

, or to order summary suspension of a license. These actions shall be done in accordance with the procedures set out in G.S. 150B and this Article and rules adopted by the Commission.

To issue final agency decisions in all G.S. 150B contested cases proceedings filed as a result of actions taken under this Article including, but not limited to the denial, revocation, or suspension of a license or the levying of a civil or administrative penalty.

To issue a license to any child care arrangement that does not meet the definition of child care facility in

G.S. 110-86

whenever the operator of the arrangement chooses to comply with the requirements of this Article and the rules adopted by the Commission and voluntarily applies for a child care facility license. The Commission shall adopt rules for the issuance or removal of the licenses.Notwithstanding any other provision of law, rules adopted by the Commission regarding a public school that voluntarily applies for a child care facility license shall provide that a classroom that meets the standards set out in

G.S. 115C-521.1

shall satisfy child care facility licensure requirements as related to the physical classroom.

Capacity of Facility Maximum Fee 12 or fewer children $ 52.00 13-50 children $187.00 51-100 children $375.00 101 or more children $600.00

History.

1971, c. 803, s. 1; 1975, c. 879, s. 15; 1985, c. 757, ss. 155(g), 156(cc), (dd); 1987, c. 788, s. 4; c. 827, s. 233; 1991, c. 273, s. 3; 1993, c. 185, s. 2; 1997-443, s. 11A.118(a); 1997-506, s. 5; 2003-284, s. 34.12(a); 2005-36, s. 1; 2009-123, s. 2; 2009-451, s. 10.11.

§ 110-90.1.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1997-506, s. 6.

§ 110-90.2.
Mandatory child care providers’ criminal history checks.

For purposes of this section:

“Child care”, notwithstanding the definition in

G.S. 110-86

, means any child care provided in child care facilities required to be licensed or regulated under this Article and nonlicensed child care homes approved to receive or receiving State or federal funds for providing child care.

“Child care provider” means a person who:

Is employed by or seeks to be employed by a child care facility providing child care as defined in subdivision (1) of this subsection, whether in temporary or permanent capacity, including substitute providers;

Owns or operates or seeks to own or operate a child care facility or nonlicensed child care home providing child care as defined in subdivision (1) of this subsection; or

Is a member of the household in a family child care home, nonlicensed child care home, or child care center in a residence and who is over 15 years old, including family members and nonfamily members who use the home on a permanent or temporary basis as their place of residence.

“Criminal history” means a county, state, or federal criminal history of conviction or pending indictment of a crime or criminal charge, whether a misdemeanor or a felony, that bears upon an individual’s fitness to have responsibility for the safety and well-being of children. Such crimes include, but are not limited to, the following North Carolina crimes contained in any of the following Articles of Chapter 14 of the General Statutes: Article 6, Homicide; Article 7B, Rape and Other Sex Offenses; Article 8, Assaults; Article 10, Kidnapping and Abduction; Article 13, Malicious Injury or Damage by Use of Explosive or Incendiary Device or Material; Article 14, Burglary; Article 16, Larceny; Article 17, Robbery; Article 19, False Pretenses and Cheats; Article 19A, Obtaining Property or Services by False or Fraudulent Use of Credit Device or Other Means; Article 19C, Identity Theft; Article 26, Offenses Against Public Morality and Decency; Article 27, Prostitution; Article 29, Bribery; Article 35, Offenses Against the Public Peace; Article 36A, Riots and Civil Disorders; Article 39, Protection of Minors; Article 40, Protection of the Family; Article 52, Miscellaneous Police Regulations; and Article 59, Public Intoxication. Such crimes also include cruelty to animals in violation of Article 3 of Chapter 19A of the General Statutes, possession or sale of drugs in violation of the North Carolina Controlled Substances Act, Article 5 of Chapter 90 of the General Statutes, and alcohol-related offenses such as sale to underage persons in violation of

G.S. 18B-302

or driving while impaired in violation of

G.S. 20-138.1

through

G.S. 20-138.5

. In addition to the North Carolina crimes listed in this subdivision, such crimes also include similar crimes under federal law or under the laws of other states.

“Substitute provider” means a person who temporarily assumes the duties of a staff person for a time period not to exceed two consecutive months and may or may not be monetarily compensated by the facility.

“Uncompensated provider” means a person who works in a child care facility and is counted in staff/child ratio or has unsupervised contact with children, but who is not monetarily compensated by the facility.

(a1)

No person shall be a child care provider or uncompensated child care provider who has been any of the following:

(1)

Convicted of a misdemeanor or a felony crime involving child neglect or child abuse.

(2)

Adjudicated a “responsible individual” under G.S. 7B-311(b).

(3)

Convicted of a “reportable conviction” as defined under G.S. 14-208.6(4).

Effective January 1, 1996, the Department shall ensure that, prior to employment and every three years thereafter, the criminal history of all child care providers is checked and a determination is made of the child care provider’s fitness to have responsibility for the safety and well-being of children based on the criminal history. The Department shall ensure that all child care providers are checked for county, State, and federal criminal histories.

(b1)

The Department may prevent an individual from being a child care provider if the Department determines that the individual is a habitually excessive user of alcohol, illegally uses narcotic or other impairing drugs, or is mentally or emotionally impaired to an extent that may be injurious to children.

The Department of Public Safety shall provide to the Division of Child Development, Department of Health and Human Services, the criminal history from the State and National Repositories of Criminal Histories of any child care provider as requested by the Division.The Division shall provide to the Department of Public Safety, along with the request, the fingerprints of the provider to be checked, any additional information required by the Department of Public Safety, and a form consenting to the check of the criminal record and to the use of fingerprints and other identifying information required by the repositories signed by the child care provider to be checked. The fingerprints of the provider shall be forwarded to the State Bureau of Investigation for a search of their criminal history record file and the State Bureau of Investigation shall forward a set of fingerprints to the Federal Bureau of Investigation for a federal criminal history record check.At the time of application the child care provider whose criminal history is to be checked shall be furnished with a statement substantially similar to the following:

NOTICE

CHILD CARE PROVIDER
MANDATORY CRIMINAL HISTORY CHECK

NORTH CAROLINA LAW REQUIRES THAT A CRIMINAL HISTORY RECORD CHECK BE CONDUCTED ON ALL PERSONS WHO PROVIDE CHILD CARE IN A LICENSED CHILD CARE FACILITY, AND ALL PERSONS PROVIDING CHILD CARE IN NONLICENSED CHILD CARE HOMES THAT RECEIVE STATE OR FEDERAL FUNDS.
“Criminal history“ means a county, state, or federal criminal history of conviction, pending indictment of a crime, or criminal charge, whether a misdemeanor or a felony, that bears on an individual’s fitness to have responsibility for the safety and well-being of children. Such crimes include, but are not limited to, the following North Carolina crimes contained in any of the following Articles of Chapter 14 of the General Statutes: Article 6, Homicide; Article 7B, Rape and Other Sex Offenses; Article 8, Assaults; Article 10, Kidnapping and Abduction; Article 13, Malicious Injury or Damage by Use of Explosive or Incendiary Device or Material; Article 14, Burglary; Article 16, Larceny; Article 17, Robbery; Article 19, False Pretenses and Cheats; Article 19A, Obtaining Property or Services by False or Fraudulent Use of Credit Device or Other Means; Article 19C, Identity Theft; Article 26, Offenses Against Public Morality and Decency; Article 27, Prostitution; Article 29, Bribery; Article 35, Offenses Against the Public Peace; Article 36A, Riots and Civil Disorders; Article 39, Protection of Minors; Article 40, Protection of the Family; and Article 59, Public Intoxication. Such crimes also include cruelty to animals in violation of Article 3 of Chapter 19A of the General Statutes, violation of the North Carolina Controlled Substances Act, Article 5 of Chapter 90 of the General Statutes, and alcohol-related offenses such as sale to underage persons in violation of

G.S. 18B-302

or driving while impaired in violation of

G.S. 20-138.1

through

G.S. 20-138.5

. In addition to the North Carolina crimes listed in this notice, such crimes also include similar crimes under federal law or under the laws of other states. Your fingerprints will be used to check the criminal history records of the State Bureau of Investigation (SBI) and the Federal Bureau of Investigation (FBI).
If it is determined, based on your criminal history, that you are unfit to have responsibility for the safety and well-being of children, you shall have the opportunity to complete, or challenge the accuracy of, the information contained in the SBI or FBI identification records.
If you disagree with the determination of the North Carolina Department of Health and Human Services on your fitness to provide child care, you may file a civil lawsuit within 60 days after receiving written notification of disqualification in the district court in the county where you live.
Any child care provider who intentionally falsifies any information required to be furnished to conduct the criminal history record check shall be guilty of a Class 2 misdemeanor.Refusal to consent to a criminal history record check or intentional falsification of any information required to be furnished to conduct a criminal history record check is grounds for the Department to prohibit the child care provider from providing child care. Any child care provider who intentionally falsifies any information required to be furnished to conduct the criminal history shall be guilty of a Class 2 misdemeanor.

The Department shall notify in writing the child care provider, and the child care provider’s employer, if any, or for nonlicensed child care homes the local purchasing agency, of the determination by the Department whether the child care provider is qualified to provide child care based on the child care provider’s criminal history. In accordance with the law regulating the dissemination of the contents of the criminal history file furnished by the Federal Bureau of Investigation, the Department shall not release nor disclose any portion of the child care provider’s criminal history to the child care provider or the child care provider’s employer or local purchasing agency. The Department shall also notify the child care provider of the procedure for completing or challenging the accuracy of the criminal history and the child care provider’s right to contest the Department’s determination in court.A child care provider who disagrees with the Department’s decision may file a civil action in the district court of the county of residence of the child care provider within 60 days after receiving written notification of disqualification. Review of the Department’s determination disqualifying a child care provider shall be de novo. No jury trial is available for appeals to district court under this section.

All the information that the Department receives through the checking of the criminal history is privileged information and is not a public record but is for the exclusive use of the Department and those persons authorized under this section to receive the information. The Department may destroy the information after it is used for the purposes authorized by this section after one calendar year.

There shall be no liability for negligence on the part of an employer of a child care provider, an owner or operator of a child care facility, a State or local agency, or the employees of a State or local agency, arising from any action taken or omission by any of them in carrying out the provisions of this section. The immunity established by this subsection shall not extend to gross negligence, wanton conduct, or intentional wrongdoing that would otherwise be actionable. The immunity established by this subsection is waived to the extent of indemnification by insurance, indemnification under Article 31A of Chapter 143 of the General Statutes, and to the extent sovereign immunity is waived under the Torts Claim Act, as set forth in Article 31 of Chapter 143 of the General Statutes.

The child care provider shall pay the cost of the fingerprinting and the federal criminal history record check in accordance with G.S. 143B-934. The Department of Public Safety shall perform the State criminal history record check. The Department of Health and Human Services shall pay for and conduct the county criminal history record check. Child care providers who reside outside the State bear the cost of the county criminal history record check and shall provide the county criminal history record check to the Division of Child Development as required by this section.

Repealed by Session Laws 2013-410, s. 46, effective August 23, 2013.

History.

1995, c. 507, s. 23.25(a); c. 542, s. 25.2; 1997-443, s. 11A.118(a); 1997-506, s. 7; 2012-160, s. 1; 2013-410, s. 46; 2013-413, s. 12; 2014-100, s. 17.1(o), (pp); 2014-115, s. 17; 2015-181, s. 47; 2015-264, s. 55.